North Carolina statutes. Chapter 93A. Real Estate License Law.
Article 4. Timeshares.
§ 93A-62.
Delinquent assessments; developer guarantee.

Delinquent assessments may bear interest at the highest rate permitted by law or at some lesser rate established by the managing entity. In addition to interest, the managing entity may charge a reasonable administrative late fee for each delinquent assessment. Any costs of collection, including reasonable collection agency fees and reasonable attorney’s fees, incurred in the collection of a delinquent assessment shall be paid by the owner and shall be secured by a lien in favor of the managing entity upon the timeshare with respect to which the delinquent assessment has been incurred.

The managing entity may deny the use of the timeshare units or facilities, including the denial of the right to make a reservation or the cancellation of a confirmed reservation for timeshare periods, to any owner who is delinquent in the payment of any assessments made by the managing entity against the owner for common expenses, in accordance with the following:

The managing entity must, no less than 30 days after the date the assessment is due, notify the owner in writing of the total amount of any delinquency which then exists, including any accrued interest and late charges permitted to be imposed under the terms of the timeshare program or by law and including a per diem amount. The notice shall be sent to the owner at the owner’s known address as recorded in the books and records of the timeshare program.

The notice shall clearly state that the owner will not be permitted to use the owner’s timeshare, that the owner will not be permitted to make a reservation in the timeshare program’s reservation system, or that any confirmed reservation may be canceled until the total amount of such delinquency is satisfied in full or until the owner produces satisfactory evidence that the delinquency does not exist.

The notice shall be effective to bar the use of the owner and those claiming use rights under the owner, including the owner’s guests, lessees, and persons receiving use rights in the timeshare through an exchange program; provided, however, that (i) a managing entity desiring to deny the use of the timeshare to persons receiving use rights in the delinquent owner’s timeshare through an exchange program that has an affiliation agreement with the managing entity shall notify the affiliated exchange company in writing of the denial of use at the time that the notice was sent to the owner and (ii) any person claiming through the affiliated exchange program who has received a confirmed assignment of the delinquent owner’s use rights from the affiliated exchange company prior to the expiration of 48 hours after the receipt by the affiliated exchange company of the written notice from the managing entity shall be permitted by the managing entity to use the owner’s use rights.

Any costs reasonably incurred by the managing entity in connection with its compliance with the requirements of this section may be assessed by the managing entity against the delinquent owner and collected in the same manner as if those costs were common expenses of the timeshare program allocable solely to the delinquent purchaser.

A managing entity may not enforce the denial of use against any one owner or group of owners without similarly enforcing it against all owners, including all developers.

In addition to the denial of use pursuant to subsection (b) of this section, the managing entity may give further notice to the delinquent owner that the managing entity may rent the delinquent owner’s timeshare, or any use rights appurtenant thereto, in accordance with the following:

A further notice of intent to rent must be given no less than 30 days after the date the assessment is due and must be delivered to the purchaser in the manner required for notices under subsection (b) of this section.

The notice shall state that unless the owner satisfies the delinquency in full, or unless the owner produces satisfactory evidence that the delinquency does not exist, the purchaser will be bound by the terms of any rental contract entered into by the managing entity with respect to the owner’s timeshare or appurtenant use rights.

The notice shall state that the owner will remain liable for any difference between the amount of the delinquency and the net amount produced by the rental contract and applied against the delinquency, and the managing entity shall not be required to provide any further notice to the owner regarding any residual delinquency.

The managing entity’s efforts to secure a rental shall not commence on a date earlier than 10 days after the date of the notice of intent to rent.

The managing entity must apply the proceeds of any rental, net of any rental commissions, cleaning charges, travel agent commissions, or any other commercially reasonable charges reasonably and usually incurred by the managing entity in securing rentals to the delinquent owner’s account.

A managing entity may make a reasonable determination regarding the priority of rentals of timeshares and, if the delinquent owner whose timeshare is rented cannot be specifically determined due to the structure of the timeshare program, the managing entity may allocate any net rental proceeds in any reasonable manner.

In securing a rental, the managing entity shall not be required to obtain the highest nightly rental rate available, nor any particular rental rate, and the managing entity shall not be required to rent the entire timeshare or appurtenant rights; however, the managing entity must use reasonable efforts to secure a rental that is commensurate with other rentals of similar timeshares or use rights generally secured at that time.

For timeshare estates located in this State, the managing entity shall have a lien on a timeshare for any assessment levied against that timeshare from the date such assessment becomes due. The managing entity shall also have a lien on a timeshare estate of any owner for the cost of any maintenance, repairs, or replacement resulting from an act of the owner or the owner’s guest or lessee that results in damage to the timeshare property. All of the following apply to a lien imposed under this section:

The managing entity, or the holder of the lien, may bring a judicial action in its name to foreclose the lien in the nature of an action to foreclose a mortgage or deed of trust and may also bring an action to recover a money judgment for the unpaid assessments without waiving any claim of lien. As an alternative to initiating a judicial action, the managing entity may initiate a nonjudicial foreclosure proceeding to foreclose the assessment lien.

The lien is effective from the date of and shall relate back to the recording of the original timeshare declaration, or, in the case of lien on a timeshare located in a phase timeshare program, the last to occur of the recording of the original timeshare declaration or amendment creating the timeshare. However, as to first mortgages of record, the lien is effective from and after filing of the claim of lien in the office of the clerk of superior court in the county where the timeshare estate is located.

The claim of lien shall state the name of the timeshare program and identify the timeshare for which the lien is effective, state the name of the owner, state the assessment amount due, and state the due dates. The claim of lien shall be signed and acknowledged by an officer or agent of the managing entity or the holder.

The lien shall expire upon the earlier of:

The date it is satisfied.

Five years from the date the claim of lien is filed unless an action to enforce the lien is commenced within that time.

A claim of lien for assessments may include assessments which are due when the claim is recorded and all assessments that subsequently become due and are delinquent. Upon full payment, the person making the payment is entitled to receive a satisfaction of the lien.

A judgment in any action or suit brought to foreclose the claim of lien may include costs and reasonable attorney’s fees for the substantially prevailing party.

A successor in interest, regardless of how the timeshare has been acquired, including a purchaser at a judicial sale or foreclosure trustee sale, is jointly and severally liable with their predecessor in interest for all unpaid assessments against the predecessor up to the time of transfer of the timeshare to a successor, without prejudice to any right a successor in interest may have to recover from their predecessor in interest any amounts assessed against the predecessor and paid by the successor; provided, however, a first mortgagee or its successor or assignee who acquires title to a timeshare as a result of the foreclosure of the mortgage or by deed in lieu of foreclosure of the mortgage shall be exempt from liability for all unpaid assessments attributable to the timeshare or chargeable to the previous owner which came due prior to acquisition of title by the first mortgagee.

If the developer agrees to guarantee the level of assessments for the timeshare program for any period of time, the developer may be excused from the payment of the developer’s share of the assessments that otherwise would have been assessed against developer-owned timeshares during the guarantee period, provided that the developer guarantees that (i) during the guarantee period the assessments against owner timeshares will not increase over the dollar amount stated in the adopted, good-faith budget of the timeshare program and (ii) the developer will pay any amount by which all common expenses incurred during the guarantee period exceed the total revenues of the timeshare program during the guarantee period.

History.

2021-163, s. 1(c); 2021-192, s. 5(a).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws
2021-163, s. 3, as amended by Session Laws
2021-192, s. 5(a), made this section effective October 6, 2021, and further provided: “Section 1(c) of this act does not apply to timeshare transfer services or to transfer service providers prior to July 1, 2022.”

§ 93A-63.
Reservation systems.

The developer shall describe in the timeshare declaration any creation of a reservation system and shall establish rules and regulations for its operation. In establishing these rules and regulations, the developer shall take into account the location and anticipated relative use demand of each timeshare unit and timeshare project component site that is included in the timeshare program and, the developer shall use its best efforts, in good faith and based upon all reasonably available evidence under the circumstances, to further the best interests of the owners as a whole with respect to their opportunity to use and enjoy the timeshare units.

The rules and regulations shall also provide for periodic adjustment or amendment of the reservation system by the reservation system operator from time to time in order to respond to actual owner use patterns and changes in owner use demand for the timeshare units existing at that time within the timeshare program. In addition to any other rights granted by the rules and regulations of the timeshare program, the reservation system operator is authorized to manage the reservation and use of the timeshare program using those processes, analyses, procedures, and methods that are in the best interests of the owners as a whole to efficiently manage the timeshare program.

The reservation system operator shall have the right to forecast anticipated reservation and use of the timeshare units, including the right to take into account current and previous reservation and use of the timeshare units, information about events that are scheduled to occur, seasonal use patterns, and other pertinent factors that affect the reservation or use of the timeshare program.

The reservation system operator is authorized to reserve timeshare periods and timeshare units, in the best interests of the owners as a whole, for the purposes of depositing any reserved use with an affiliated exchange program or renting any reserved timeshare periods or timeshare units in order to facilitate the use or future use of the timeshare period or timeshare units or other benefits made available through the timeshare program to owners.

If the reservation system operator is not the timeshare owners’ association, the following provisions shall apply with respect to termination of the reservation system operator’s management agreement or reservation agreement:

No later than 90 days after the date of termination, or another date as set forth in the applicable management agreement or reservation agreement, the terminated reservation system operator shall transfer to the timeshare owners’ association, or any designated successor reservation system operator, all relevant data held by the prior reservation system operator and related to any reservation system and any other records and information as is necessary to permit the uninterrupted operation and administration of the reservation system. However, the information required to be transferred does not include private information of the terminated reservation system operator that is not directly related to operation and management of the timeshare program.

All reasonable costs incurred by the terminated reservation system operator in effecting the transfer of information shall be reimbursed to the terminated reservation system operator as a common expense of the timeshare program within 10 days after the completed transfer of the information.

Nothing contained in this section shall preclude a reservation system operator from providing in its agreement with the timeshare owners’ association or in the timeshare declaration that the reservation system operator owns the reservation system and that the reservation system operator shall continue to own the reservation system in the event that it is terminated.

History.

2021-163, s. 1(c); 2021-192, s. 5(a).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws
2021-163, s. 3, as amended by Session Laws
2021-192, s. 5(a), made this section effective October 6, 2021, and further provided: “Section 1(c) of this act does not apply to timeshare transfer services or to transfer service providers prior to July 1, 2022.”

§ 93A-64.
Multisite timeshare program additions, substitutions, and deletions.

With respect to addition of timeshare units, amenities, or timeshare projects to the multisite timeshare program, the timeshare declaration must provide for the following:

The basis upon which new timeshare units, amenities, or timeshare projects may be added, by whom additions may be made, and the fiscal impact, if any, of any additions on the owners.

The extent, if any, to which owners will have the right to consent to any proposed additions.

The person authorized to make additions during the term of the multisite timeshare program must comply with the one-to-one use night to use right ratio and the requirements of

G.S. 93A-63

in ascertaining the desirability of the proposed addition and any impact of the proposed addition upon the demand for and availability of existing timeshare units, amenities, or timeshare projects.

With respect to substitution of timeshare units, amenities, or timeshare projects for existing timeshare units, amenities, or timeshare projects in a multisite timeshare program, the timeshare declaration must provide for the following:

The basis upon which timeshare units, amenities, or timeshare projects may be substituted for existing timeshare units, amenities, or timeshare projects, by whom substitutions may be made, and the fiscal impact, if any, of any substitutions on the owners.

The replacement timeshare units, amenities, or timeshare projects must provide owners with an opportunity to enjoy a substantially similar or improved vacation experience as compared to the experience available at the replaced timeshare units, amenities, or timeshare projects. In determining whether the replacement timeshare units, amenities, or timeshare projects will provide a substantially similar or improved vacation experience, all relevant factors may be considered, including, but not limited to, some or all of the following: size; capacity; furnishings; maintenance; location, including geographic, topographic, and scenic considerations; demand and availability for owner use; and recreational capabilities.

If a timeshare owned by the owner in a multisite timeshare program is a timeshare estate in a specific timeshare unit, no substitution may be made of that timeshare unit without the approval of that owner and all other owners of timeshare estates in that timeshare unit.

If the timeshare declaration provides that the developer, acting unilaterally, or a managing entity under common ownership or control with the developer is the person who is authorized to make substitutions, the developer or managing entity may not substitute available timeshare units in the multisite timeshare program in a given calendar year pursuant to this subsection if the amount of the substituted timeshare units provides more than ten percent (10%) of the total annual use availability in the multisite timeshare program calculated in seven-day increments.

If the timeshare declaration provides that the managing entity is the person authorized to make substitutions, and the managing entity is not under common ownership or control with the developer, the managing entity may not substitute available timeshare units in the multisite timeshare program in a given calendar year pursuant to this subsection if the amount of the substituted timeshare units provides more than twenty-five percent (25%) of the total annual use availability in the multisite timeshare program calculated in seven-day increments.

If the owners have the right to consent to any proposed substitutions, and the person authorized to make substitutions receives, within 21 days after the date of the notice of substitution required by this subsection, a written objection to the proposed substitution from at least ten percent (10%) of all owners in the multisite timeshare program, a meeting of the owners must be conducted by the managing entity within 30 days after the end of the 21-day period. The proposed substitution is ratified unless it is rejected by a majority of owners voting in person or by proxy at the meeting, provided that at least twenty-five percent (25%) of all owners cast votes.

The person authorized to make substitutions may make unlimited substitutions in a given year if a proposed substitution is approved in advance by a majority of owners of the multisite timeshare program voting in person or by proxy at a meeting called for that purpose, provided that at least twenty-five percent (25%) of the total number of owners cast votes.

The person authorized to make substitutions shall notify all owners of the multisite timeshare program in writing of the decision to make a substitution. This notice must meet all of the following requirements:

The notice must be given at least six months in advance of the date that the proposed substitution will occur.

The notice must state the last day after the end of the six-month period on which reservations will be accepted from owners for use of the existing timeshare units that will be replaced.

The notice must state that owners shall have 21 days after the date of the notice of substitution to file a written objection with the person authorized to make substitutions.

The person authorized to make substitutions may remove existing timeshare units for substitution only after those timeshare units have no pending purchaser use reservations.

The person authorized to make substitutions must comply with the one-to-one use night to use right ratio and the requirements of

G.S. 93A-63

in ascertaining the desirability of the proposed substitution and its impact upon the demand for and availability of existing timeshare units, amenities, or timeshare projects.

With respect to deletion of timeshare units, amenities, or timeshare projects, the timeshare declaration must provide for the following:

If the deletion is as a result of a casualty, the following apply:

The timeshare declaration must provide for casualty insurance for the timeshare units or amenities in an amount equal to the replacement cost of those timeshare units or amenities. The timeshare declaration must also provide that in the event of a casualty that results in timeshare units, amenities, or timeshare projects being unavailable for use by owners, the managing entity shall notify all affected owners of the unavailability of use within 30 days after the event of casualty.

The timeshare declaration must also provide for the application of any insurance proceeds arising from a casualty to either the replacement or acquisition of additional similar timeshare units or to the removal of owners from the multisite timeshare program so that owners will not be competing for available timeshare units or amenities on a greater than one-to-one use night to use right ratio.

If the timeshare instrument does not provide for business income insurance, or if it is unavailable, or if the declaration permits the developer, the managing entity, or the owners to elect not to reconstruct after casualty under certain circumstances or to secure replacement timeshare units in lieu of reconstruction, owners may temporarily compete for available accommodations on a greater than one-to-one use night to use right ratio. The decision whether or not to reconstruct shall be made as promptly as possible under the circumstances.

Any replacement of timeshare units, amenities, or timeshare projects must comply with the one-to-one use night to use right ratio and the requirements of

G.S. 93A-63

in ascertaining the desirability of the proposed addition and its impact upon the demand for and availability of existing timeshare units, amenities, or timeshare projects.

If the deletion is as a result of an eminent domain proceeding, the following apply:

The timeshare declaration must provide for the application of any proceeds arising from a taking under eminent domain proceedings to either the replacement or acquisition of additional similar timeshare units or to the removal of owners so that owners will not be competing for available timeshare units on a greater than one-to-one use night to use right requirement ratio.

Any replacement of timeshare units, amenities, or timeshare projects must comply with the one-to-one use night to use right ratio and the requirements of

G.S. 93A-63

in ascertaining the desirability of the proposed addition and its impact upon the demand for and availability of existing timeshare units, amenities, or timeshare projects.

The timeshare declaration may provide that timeshare units, amenities, or timeshare projects will be deleted upon the expiration of the term of their availability or as otherwise provided in the timeshare declaration. However, the timeshare declaration must also provide that if a timeshare unit is deleted in this manner, a sufficient number of owners will also be deleted, or a sufficient number of substitute timeshare units will be substituted for the deleted timeshare units, so as to maintain no greater than a one-to-one use night to use right ratio.

History.

2021-163, s. 1(c); 2021-192, s. 5(a).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws
2021-163, s. 3, as amended by Session Laws
2021-192, s. 5(a), made this section effective October 6, 2021, and further provided: “Section 1(c) of this act does not apply to timeshare transfer services or to transfer service providers prior to July 1, 2022.”

§ 93A-65.
Resale purchase contracts; prohibition against advance listing fee.

A consumer timeshare reseller, or any agent of a reseller, must use a resale purchase contract which must contain all of the following:

An identification of the timeshare.

The name and address of the timeshare program and of the managing entity of the timeshare program.

Immediately prior to the disclosure required by subdivision (5) of this subsection, a statement in conspicuous type in substantially the following form:

“The current year’s assessment allocable to the timeshare you are purchasing is [insert amount]. This assessment, which may be increased from time to time by the managing entity of the timeshare program, is payable in full each year on or before [insert date]. This assessment [includes/does not include] yearly real estate taxes, which [are/are not] billed and collected separately. Each owner is personally liable for the payment of assessments, and failure to timely pay these assessments may result in restriction or loss of your use or ownership rights. There are many important documents relating to the timeshare program which you should review prior to purchasing a timeshare, including the timeshare declaration, the timeshare owners’ association articles and bylaws, the current year’s operating and reserve budgets, and any rules and regulations affecting the use of timeshare units and amenities.”

If there are any delinquent assessments or real estate taxes outstanding with respect to the timeshare, the following statement must be included in the statement described in subdivision (3) of this subsection:

“A delinquency in the amount of [insert amount] for unpaid assessments or real estate taxes currently exists with respect to the timeshare you are purchasing, together with a per diem charge of [insert amount] for interest and late charges.”

A statement in conspicuous type located immediately prior to the space in the contract reserved for the signature of the purchaser in the following form:

“You may cancel this contract without any penalty or obligation within five days after the date you sign this contract. If you decide to cancel this contract, you must notify the seller in writing of your intent to cancel. Your notice of cancellation shall be effective upon the date sent and shall be sent to the seller at [insert address]. Any attempt to obtain a waiver of your cancellation right is void and of no effect. While you may execute all closing documents in advance, the closing before expiration of your five-day cancellation period is prohibited.”

The year in which the purchaser will first be entitled to reserve, use, or occupy a timeshare unit.

If a resale purchase contract is not used or does not comply with the provisions of this section, the transaction shall be voidable at the option of the purchaser for a period of one year after the date of transfer.

It is unlawful for any resale broker to collect any advance fee for the listing of any timeshare.

History.

2021-163, s. 1(c); 2021-192, s. 5(a).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-163, s. 3, as amended by Session Laws 2021-192, s. 5(a), made this section effective October 6, 2021, and further provided: “Section 1(c) of this act does not apply to timeshare transfer services or to transfer service providers prior to July 1, 2022.”

§ 93A-66.
Record keeping by resale service providers, transfer service providers, and lead dealers.

Resale service providers, lead dealers, and transfer service providers shall maintain the following records for a period of three years from the date each piece of personal contact information is obtained:

A copy of all pieces of personal contact information obtained.

Resale service providers, transfer service providers, and lead dealers who receive personal contact information from other lead dealers shall maintain records disclosing:

The full name, address, and telephone number of the lead dealer from which the personal contact information was obtained.

The date, time, and place of the transaction at which the personal contact information was obtained, along with the amount of consideration paid and a signed receipt from the lead dealer or copy of a canceled check.

Resale service providers, transfer service providers, and lead dealers who obtained personal contact information by directly researching and assembling such information and did not obtain such information from a lead dealer shall maintain records disclosing:

A complete written description of the source from which each piece of personal contact information was obtained.

The methodologies used for researching and assembling the personal contact information.

The date, time, and place at which the piece of personal contact information was obtained.

The full name, address, and telephone number of each person who performed the work to obtain the piece of personal contact information.

History.

2021-163, s. 1(c); 2021-192, s. 5(a).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-163, s. 3, as amended by Session Laws 2021-192, s. 5(a), made this section effective October 6, 2021, and further provided: “Section 1(c) of this act does not apply to timeshare transfer services or to transfer service providers prior to July 1, 2022.”

§ 93A-67.
Resale service providers.

Before engaging in resale advertising services, a resale service provider must provide to the consumer timeshare reseller in writing (i) a description of any fees or costs related to the services that the consumer timeshare reseller, or any other person, is required [to] pay to the resale service provider or to any third party and (ii) a description of when the fees or costs are due.

A resale service provider may not engage in real estate broker activities described in Article 1 of this Chapter without being the holder of an active license in accordance with Article 1 of this Chapter.

In the course of offering resale advertising services, a resale advertiser may not do any of the following:

State or imply that the resale advertiser will provide or assist in providing any type of direct sales or resale brokerage services other than the advertising of the consumer resale timeshare for sale or rent by the consumer timeshare reseller.

State or imply to a consumer timeshare reseller, directly or indirectly, that the resale advertiser has identified a person interested in buying or renting the timeshare resale interest without providing the name, address, and telephone number of the represented interested resale purchaser.

State or imply to a consumer timeshare reseller, directly or indirectly, that sales or rentals have been achieved or generated as a result of its advertising services unless the resale advertiser, at the time of making that representation, possesses and is able to provide documentation to substantiate the statement or implication made to the consumer timeshare reseller. In addition, to the extent that a resale advertiser states or implies to a consumer timeshare reseller that the resale advertiser has sold or rented any specific number of timeshares, the resale advertiser must also provide the consumer timeshare reseller the ratio or percentage of all the timeshares that have resulted in a sale versus the number of timeshares advertised for sale by the resale advertiser for each of the previous two calendar years if the statement or implication is about a sale or sales, or the ratio or percentage of all the timeshares that have actually resulted in a rental versus the number of timeshares advertised for rental by the resale advertiser for each of the previous two calendar years if the statement or implication is about a rental or rentals.

State or imply to a consumer timeshare reseller that the timeshare has a specific resale value.

Make or submit any charge to a consumer timeshare reseller’s credit card account, make or cause to be made any electronic transfer of consumer timeshare reseller funds, or collect any payment from a consumer timeshare reseller that exceeds an aggregate total amount of seventy-five dollars ($75.00) or more in any 12-month period unless the following have occurred:

The consumer timeshare reseller has been provided a copy of the terms and conditions of the contract for resale advertising services and the consumer timeshare reseller has agreed to those terms and conditions by mail or electronic transmission.

The resale advertiser has received a written contract complying in all respects with this section and that has been signed by the consumer timeshare reseller.

Engage in any resale advertising services for compensation or other valuable consideration without first obtaining a written brokerage agreement to provide resale advertising services signed by the consumer timeshare reseller. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the contract must be printed in at least 12-point type and must contain the following information:

The name, address, telephone number, and internet address, if any, of the resale advertiser and a mailing address and email address to which a contract cancellation notice may be delivered at the consumer timeshare reseller’s election.

A complete description of all resale advertising services to be provided, including, but not limited to, details regarding the publications, internet sites, and other media in or on which the consumer resale timeshare will be advertised; the dates or time intervals for such advertising or the minimum number of times such advertising will be run in each specific medium; the itemized cost to the consumer timeshare reseller of each resale advertising service to be provided; and a statement of the total cost to the consumer timeshare reseller of all resale advertising services to be provided.

A statement printed in conspicuous type immediately preceding the space in the contract provided for the consumer timeshare reseller’s signature in substantially the following form:

“Timeshare Owner’s Right of Cancellation

[Insert name of resale advertiser] will provide resale advertising services pursuant to this contract. If the resale advertiser represents that they have identified a person who is interested in purchasing or renting your timeshare, then the resale advertiser must provide you with the name, address, and telephone number of such represented interested resale purchaser.

You have an unwaivable right to cancel this contract for any reason within five days after the date you sign this contract. If you decide to cancel this contract, you must notify [insert name of resale advertiser] in writing of your intent to cancel. Your notice of cancellation shall be effective upon the date sent and shall be sent to [insert resale advertiser’s physical address] or to [insert resale advertiser’s email address]. Your refund will be made within 20 days after receipt of notice of cancellation or within five days after receipt of funds from your cleared check, whichever is later.

You are not obligated to pay [insert name of resale advertiser] any money unless you sign this contract and return it to the retail advertiser.

Important: Before signing this contract, you should carefully review your original purchase document and other timeshare program documents to determine whether the developer has reserved a right of first refusal or other option to purchase your timeshare or to determine whether there are any restrictions or special conditions applicable to the resale or rental of your timeshare.”

A statement that any resale contract entered into by or on behalf of the consumer timeshare reseller must comply in all respects with

G.S. 93A-65

, including the provision of a five-day cancellation period for the prospective consumer resale purchaser.

Fail to honor any cancellation notice sent by the consumer timeshare reseller within five days after the date the consumer timeshare reseller signs the contract for resale advertising services.

Fail to provide a full refund of all money paid by a consumer timeshare reseller within 20 days after receipt of notice of cancellation or within five days after receipt of funds from a cleared check, whichever is later.

If a resale service provider uses a contract for resale advertising services that fails to comply with the requirements of this section, the contract shall be voidable at the option of the consumer timeshare reseller for a period of one year after the date it is executed by the consumer timeshare reseller.

Notwithstanding obligations placed upon any other persons by this section, it is the duty of a resale service provider to supervise, manage, and control all aspects of the offering of resale advertising services by any agent or employee of the resale service provider. Any violation of this section that occurs during that offering shall be deemed a violation by the resale service provider as well as by the person actually committing the violation.

Providing resale advertising services with respect to a consumer resale timeshare in a timeshare property located or offered within this State, or in a multisite timeshare program registered or required to be registered to be offered in this State, including acting as an agent or third-party service provider for a resale service provider, constitutes operating, conducting, engaging in, or carrying on a business or business venture in this State.

If a resale service provider also offers timeshare transfer services, the resale service provider must comply with

G.S. 93A-68

.

Any violation of this section is an unfair or deceptive act or practice prohibited by

G.S. 75-1.1

.

History.

2021-163, s. 1(c); 2021-192, s. 5(a).

Editor's Note.

The bracketed correction in subsection (a) was made at the direction of the Revisor of Statutes.

Session Laws 2021-163, s. 3, as amended by Session Laws 2021-192, s. 5(a), made this section effective October 6, 2021, and further provided: “Section 1(c) of this act does not apply to timeshare transfer services or to transfer service providers prior to July 1, 2022.”